Hawaii, session 2026, SB2518.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that nationwide data demonstrate an increase in the number of law enforcement officers killed and assaulted.  Local police officers are facing serious dangers in their daily work. Furthermore, recruitment and retention of law enforcement officers is a significant and growing concern across our state and nation.  The frequency of assaults against law enforcement officers discourages applicants from joining the force and makes it difficult to retain senior officers. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish appropriate sanctions, distinguish penalties based on the level of the bodily injury sustained by the officer, and deter future crimes for the offense of assault against a law enforcement officer in the first degree by: (1)  Including recklessly causing serious or substantial bodily injury to a law enforcement officer engaged in the performance of duty as the offense of assault against a law enforcement officer in the first degree; and (2)  Increasing penalties for the offense of assault against a law enforcement officer in the first degree. SECTION 2.  Section 707-712.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§707-712.5 Assault against a law enforcement officer in the first degree.  (1)  A person commits the offense of assault against a law enforcement officer in the first degree if the person: (a)  Intentionally or knowingly causes bodily injury to a law enforcement officer who is engaged in the performance of duty; [or] (b)  Recklessly or negligently causes, with a dangerous instrument, bodily injury to a law enforcement officer who is engaged in the performance of duty[.]; or (c)  Recklessly causes serious or substantial bodily injury to a law enforcement officer who is engaged in the performance of duty. (2)  Assault of a law enforcement officer in the first degree is a class C felony.  The court shall, at a minimum, sentence the person who has been convicted of this offense to: (a)  An indeterminate term of imprisonment of five years, pursuant to section 706-660; or (b)  Five years probation, with conditions to include a term of imprisonment of not less than [thirty days] six months without possibility of suspension of sentence[.]; provided that a person convicted under subsection (1)(c) shall be subject to a term of imprisonment of not less than one year without possibility of suspension of sentence." SECTION 3.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 4.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on March 22, 2075.